Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB953.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Title 74 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a section to read:§ 9107.1. SEPTA projects.Within 90 days of the effective date of this section, the Southeastern Pennsylvania Transportation Authority shall submit one or more transportation projects to the board for consideration involving one or more transportation facilities.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.12345678910111213